src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k15_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: gestur
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: gest
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: gesti
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: gests
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: gestir
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: gestir
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: gestum
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: gesta
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: gesturin
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: gestin
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: gestinum
    gestur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: gestsins
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: gestirnir
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: gestirnar
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: gestunum
    gestur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: gestanna
